South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S391.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the State Board of Education, relating to Requirements for Certification at the Advanced Level, designated as Regulation Document Number 5318, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The State Board of Education proposes to amend R.43-64: Requirements for Certification at the Advanced Level to update and streamline requirements for educators to become certified in leadership and administrative fields and in instructional service fields. The Notice of Drafting for the proposed amendments to the regulation was published in the State Register on August 23, 2024. ----XX----